Wyoming, session 2025, HB0036.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 21-16-1301(a)(iv) and (xiv),
21-16-1304(a)(i) by creating a new subparagraph (C), (ii)
by creating a new subparagraph (C), (iii) by creating a new
subparagraph (C) and (c)(i) and 21-16-1305(a)(i) by
creating a new subparagraph (C) are amended to read:
21-16-1301. Definitions.
(a) As used in this article:
(iv) "Certificate" means a credential other than
a degree as defined in paragraph (vi) of this subsection. A
"certificate" is either an associate of applied science
degree or indicates satisfactory completion of training in
an academic year a program of study offered by a Wyoming
community college that results in a license, permit,
certificate or other government or industry recognized
qualification for working in a trade or occupation and may
require on-the-job training and credit hours to complete
the program;
(xiv) "Satisfactory academic progress" means,
except as further specified in this paragraph, completing
at least six (6) semester hours per semester if enrolled
for less than twelve (12) semester hours and completing at
least twelve (12) semester hours per semester if enrolled
for twelve (12) or more semester hours, and meeting such
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0036
ENROLLED ACT NO. 45, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
other criteria as established by the eligible institution
to ensure the student earns his degree or certificate in a
timely manner. The student's hours of enrollment for
purposes of this paragraph shall be the same number of
hours of enrollment used to determine the state's
obligation to reimburse the eligible institution for the
student's scholarship under this article. Satisfactory
academic progress shall be determined annually following
the spring semester, but a student's scholarship may be
reinstated pursuant to W.S. 21-16-1304(f)(i) or
21-16-1305(d)(i) following any semester or summer school
session. For students enrolled in a program at a Wyoming
community college that requires on-the-job training and
less than six (6) credit hours per semester to receive a
certificate, "satisfactory academic progress" means
completing all semester hours the student is enrolled in
each semester, meeting the hourly on-the-job training
requirements and meeting other criteria as established by
the Wyoming community college to ensure the student earns
the certificate in a timely manner;
21-16-1304. Hathaway opportunity, performance and
honor scholarships.
(a) Any student who meets the criteria under W.S.
21-16-1303 is eligible to receive a scholarship to pursue a
degree or certificate as follows:
(i) With a minimum cumulative high school GPA of
2.50 and a score equal to or greater than the 2015-2016
national percentile rank of forty-three (43) on a college
entrance examination administered throughout the United
States and relied upon by institutions of higher education
to determine acceptance of students for attendance, a
Hathaway opportunity scholarship for:
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0036
ENROLLED ACT NO. 45, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(C) For students enrolled in a program at a
Wyoming community college that requires on-the-job training
and credit hours to receive a certificate that are enrolled
in less than six (6) hours per semester, the amount
provided under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph times a
fraction, the numerator of which is the number of hours for
which the student is enrolled and the denominator is twelve
(12).
(ii) With a minimum cumulative high school GPA
of 3.0 and a score equal to or greater than the 2015-2016
national percentile rank of fifty-six (56) on a college
entrance examination administered throughout the United
States and relied upon by institutions of higher education
to determine acceptance of students for attendance, a
Hathaway performance scholarship for:
(C) For students enrolled in a program at a
Wyoming community college that requires on-the-job training
and credit hours to receive a certificate that are enrolled
in less than six (6) hours per semester, the amount
provided under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph times a
fraction, the numerator of which is the number of hours for
which the student is enrolled and the denominator is twelve
(12).
(iii) With a minimum cumulative high school GPA
of 3.5 and a score equal to or greater than the 2015-2016
national percentile rank of seventy-nine (79) on an
examination administered throughout the United States and
relied upon by institutions of higher education to
determine acceptance of students for attendance, a Hathaway
honor scholarship for:
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0036
ENROLLED ACT NO. 45, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(C) For students enrolled in a program at a
Wyoming community college that requires on-the-job training
and credit hours to receive a certificate that are enrolled
in less than six (6) hours per semester, the amount
provided under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph times a
fraction, the numerator of which is the number of hours for
which the student is enrolled and the denominator is twelve
(12).
(c) To remain eligible for the scholarship under this
section, the student shall:
(i) Except as provided in W.S. 21-16-1303(f) and
subsection (h) of this section, make satisfactory academic
progress toward a certificate or degree. If a student
fails to make satisfactory academic progress or maintain
the cumulative grade point average required for
continuation in the program as provided in this subsection,
the student shall become ineligible for the scholarship in
subsequent semesters unless granted an exception for cause
by the department or except as otherwise provided in
subsection (f) of this section. The department may delegate
to any eligible institution the department's authority to
grant an exception for cause, but shall only do so in
accordance with department rules establishing procedures
and criteria for granting an exception and any eligible
institution acting pursuant to such delegation shall grant
exceptions only in accordance with those rules;
21-16-1305. Hathaway provisional opportunity
scholarships.
(a) Any student who meets the criteria under W.S.
21-16-1303 is eligible to receive a Hathaway provisional
4

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0036
ENROLLED ACT NO. 45, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
opportunity scholarship to pursue a certificate or degree
as follows:
(i) With a minimum cumulative high school GPA of
2.50 and either a score equal to or greater than the
2015-2016 national percentile rank of thirty (30) on a
college entrance examination administered throughout the
United States and relied upon by institutions of higher
education to determine acceptance of students for
attendance or a qualifying cumulative score on a
career-technical aptitude test as determined by the
department, a scholarship for:
(C) For students enrolled in a program at a
Wyoming community college that requires on-the-job training
and credit hours to receive a certificate that are enrolled
in less than six (6) hours per semester, the amount
provided under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph times a
fraction, the numerator of which is the number of hours for
which the student is enrolled and the denominator is twelve
(12).
5

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0036
ENROLLED ACT NO. 45, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
6